Missouri, session 2026, HB3446.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 196, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 196.184, to read as follows:
196.184. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Major food allergen":
(a) Any of the following:
a. Milk, eggs, fish, crustacean shellfish, tree nuts, wheat, peanuts, sesame, and
soybeans; and
b. Any food ingredient that contains protein derived from a food listed in
subparagraph a. of this paragraph; and
(b) Shall not include:
a. A highly refined oil derived from a food specified in subparagraph a. of
paragraph (a) of this subdivision or any ingredient derived from that highly refined oil;
or
b. An ingredient that is exempt under the petition or notification process
specified in the federal Food Allergen Labeling and Consumer Protection Act of 2004,
Pub. L. 108-282;
(2) "Menu", the same meaning given to the term "menu or menu board" in 21
CFR 101.11;
(3) "Restaurant", a business in this state that:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3446 2
(a) Operates its own permanent food service facilities with commercial cooking
equipment on its premises; and
(b) Prepares and offers to sell multiple entrees for consumption on or off the
premises.
2. A restaurant shall provide written notification of major food allergens that the
restaurant knows or reasonably should know are contained as ingredients in each menu
item. The restaurant shall provide this information either:
(1) Directly on the restaurant's menu. If the restaurant elects to provide major
food allergen information directly on its menu, the menu item shall be followed by a
written statement below or immediately adjacent to the menu item indicating the major
food allergens contained in the menu item; or
(2) In a digital format including, but not limited to, using a quick response (QR)
code that links to the restaurant's digital menu. If a restaurant elects to provide the
major food allergen information in a digital format, the restaurant shall also use an
alternative method to provide the information to customers who are not able to access
the information in the digital format. For purposes of this subdivision, "alternative
method" includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:
(a) A separate allergen-specific menu;
(b) An allergen chart;
(c) An allergen grid;
(d) An allergen booklet; or
(e) Other written materials.
3. A restaurant shall use either of the following when providing the major food
allergen information required under this section:
(1) Common or usual names of the major food allergens; or
(2) Standardized pictograms to communicate the presence of major food
allergens.
4. The department of health and senior services shall enforce this section and
may apply for and obtain a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person
from violating this section in the same manner authorized under section 196.020.
5. The department of health and senior services may use either of the following
methods to evaluate a restaurant's compliance with this section:
(1) Visual verification of allergen disclosure. An enforcement officer may
confirm that required allergen statements are displayed on printed menus, digital
menus, or the alternative methods described in subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this
section; or

HB 3446 3
(2) Other reasonable methods of verification consistent with the intent of this
section.
6. This section shall not apply to prepackaged foods that are subject to federal
labeling requirements for major food allergens under 21 U.S.C. Section 343.
7. This section shall not alter any duty that a restaurant may have under existing
law to reasonably ensure the safety of its patrons.
✔